Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; THE REDEMPTION PROJECT.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections for a grant to The Redemption Project to provide inmates and justice-impacted individuals with virtue-based education grounded in core correctional practices, mentoring, support services, and employment services. This amount is added to the base. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end